data/hungarian.aff
SFX B   e    éiéig        e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[TERM]
SFX B   e    éiéiből      e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ELA]
SFX B   e    éiéiben      e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INE]
SFX B   e    éiéibe       e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ILL]
SFX B   e    éiéi         e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[NOM]
SFX B   e    éiéhez       e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ALL]
SFX B   e    éiéből       e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ELA]
SFX B   e    éiében       e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[INE]
SFX B   e    éiébe        e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ILL]
SFX B   e    éié          e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[NOM]
SFX B   e    éivé         e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[TRANS]
SFX B   e    éivel        e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[INSTR]
SFX B   e    éitől        e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[ABL]
SFX B   e    éitekül      e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[ESS]
SFX B   e    éitekéül     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ESS]
SFX B   e    éitekéért    e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX B   e    éitekévé     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[TRANS]
SFX B   e    éitekével    e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[INSTR]
SFX B   e    éitekétől    e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ABL]
SFX B   e    éitekét      e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ACC]
SFX B   e    éitekéről    e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[DEL]
SFX B   e    éitekért     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX B   e    éitekére     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[SBL]
SFX B   e    éitekénél    e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ADE]
SFX B   e    éitekének    e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[DAT]
SFX B   e    éitekén      e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[SUE]
SFX B   e    éitekéiül    e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ESS]
SFX B   e    éitekéiért   e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX B   e    éitekéivé    e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TRANS]
SFX B   e    éitekéivel   e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INSTR]
SFX B   e    éitekéitől   e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ABL]
SFX B   e    éitekéit     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ACC]
SFX B   e    éitekéiről   e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DEL]
SFX B   e    éitekéire    e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SBL]
SFX B   e    éitekéinél   e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ADE]
SFX B   e    éitekéinek   e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DAT]
SFX B   e    éitekéin     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SUE]
SFX B   e    éitekéiig    e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TERM]
SFX B   e    éitekéihez   e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ALL]
SFX B   e    éitekéig     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[TERM]
SFX B   e    éitekéiből   e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ELA]
SFX B   e    éitekéiben   e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INE]
SFX B   e    éitekéibe    e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ILL]
SFX B   e    éitekéi      e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[NOM]
SFX B   e    éitekéhez    e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ALL]
SFX B   e    éitekéből    e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ELA]
SFX B   e    éitekében    e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[INE]
SFX B   e    éitekébe     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ILL]
SFX B   e    éiteké       e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[NOM]
SFX B   e    éitektől     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[ABL]
SFX B   e    éitekről     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[DEL]
SFX B   e    éitekre      e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[SBL]
SFX B   e    éiteknél     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[ADE]
SFX B   e    éiteknek     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[DAT]
SFX B   e    éitekként    e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[FORM]
SFX B   e    éitekké      e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[TRANS]
SFX B   e    éitekkor     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[TEMP]
SFX B   e    éitekkel     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[INSTR]
SFX B   e    éitekig      e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[TERM]
SFX B   e    éitekhez     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[ALL]
SFX B   e    éiteket      e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[ACC]
SFX B   e    éiteken      e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[SUE]
SFX B   e    éitekből     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[ELA]
SFX B   e    éitekben     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[INE]
SFX B   e    éitekbe      e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[ILL]
SFX B   e    éitek        e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_2]+[NOM]
SFX B   e    éit          e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[ACC]
SFX B   e    éiről        e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[DEL]
SFX B   e    éire         e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[SBL]
SFX B   e    éinél        e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[ADE]
SFX B   e    éinkül       e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[ESS]
SFX B   e    éinkéül      e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ESS]
SFX B   e    éinkéért     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX B   e    éinkévé      e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[TRANS]
SFX B   e    éinkével     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[INSTR]
SFX B   e    éinkétől     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ABL]
SFX B   e    éinkét       e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ACC]
SFX B   e    éinkéről     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[DEL]
SFX B   e    éinkért      e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX B   e    éinkére      e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[SBL]
SFX B   e    éinkénél     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ADE]
SFX B   e    éinkének     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[DAT]
SFX B   e    éinkén       e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[SUE]
SFX B   e    éinkéiül     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ESS]
SFX B   e    éinkéiért    e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX B   e    éinkéivé     e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TRANS]
SFX B   e    éinkéivel    e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INSTR]
SFX B   e    éinkéitől    e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ABL]
SFX B   e    éinkéit      e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ACC]
SFX B   e    éinkéiről    e                         [PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DEL]
