data/hungarian.dic
önkiszolgálóbüfé/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäc¸źw	[noun]{+[NOM]}
Őrmingye/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
z-/BVRĐŃŐj	z[noun]{+[NOM]}
vízibicikli/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéyČŔŕYcź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
több/×nÔBDLVR	sok[adj_num]+[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}
tizenkettőezer/ŐnBVjbc	[adj_num]{+[NOM]}
t-s/Ó×nBGVLR	t[noun]{+[NOM]}+[s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}
szembekötősdi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
röfike/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
pávajérce/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéyČŔŕYcź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
ovh.-i/ŃĐŐBGVLTt	ovh.[abr]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]}
nyolcvanezres/BVb	nyolcvanezer[adj_num]{+[NOM]}
negyvenegyezres/BVb	negyvenegyezer[adj_num]{+[NOM]}
mikrorészecske/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
ltp.-es/Ó×nBGVLR	ltp.[abr]{+[NOM]}+[s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}
képedt/XBDGRV	képed[vrb]+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]
kilencvenkilencezer/ŐnBVjbc	[adj_num]{+[NOM]}
kelepce/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
hétszázezres/BV	[adj_num]{+[NOM]}
hl-es/Ó×nBGVLR	hl[noun]{+[NOM]}+[s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}
hatvanötezredik/nÓ×BVb	hatvanötezer[adj_num]+[dik_ORDINAL_adj]{+[NOM]}
harminckétezred/BVb	harminckétezer[adj_num]+[d_FRACTION_num]{+[NOM]}
gyorsbüfé/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
fogkefe/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéyČŔŕYcź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
eredt/XBDGRV	ered[vrb]+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}
dl-es/Ó×nBGVLR	dl[noun]{+[NOM]}+[s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}
cs-/BVRĐŃŐj	cs[noun]{+[NOM]}
brandy/VËŻjŐBĐŃéčłÄäRYc¸ź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
angolperje/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéyČŔŕYcź	[noun]{+[NOM]}
össz-szövetségi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
vízmelléki/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
tréfli/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
szépművészeti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
szabadtéri/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
pekingi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
nyolcféle/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
mondabeli/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
légcsövi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
képzeleti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
kebelbeli/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
hétpercenkénti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
havonkénti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
gyönge/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
feketeerdei/BÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
egyéni/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
borsod-abaúj-zempléni/BÓŐĐGVËR	[adj]{+[NOM]}
Zsilinszky/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR¸l	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Wallentinyi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Vidéky/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR¸l	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Ungvárnémeti/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Trnove/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Temesremete/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Sárosoroszi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Sztupne/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Szerbittebe/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Szarvadpele/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Sepse/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Régeni/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Repede/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Párospestyere/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Pilinszky/VËŻjŐBĐŃqŕR¸l	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Patapoklosi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Nádrai/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Nagysé/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Mártonyi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Mihálydi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Maróthi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Mac-es/Ó×nBGVLR	Mac[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}+[s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}
Lote/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
LSD-/BVRĐŃŐj	LSD[abr]{+[NOM]}
Kéméndy/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR¸l	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Komjádi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Kisgömöri/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Kende/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ¸ś	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
KDE-s/Ó×nBGVLR	KDE[abr]{+[NOM]}+[s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}
Ivánfi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Hüse/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Hevesy/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR¸l	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
HVG-/BVRĐŃŐj	HVG[abr]{+[NOM]}
Gyulatelke/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Gelley/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR¸l	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Ftv.-i/ŃĐŐBGVLTt	Ftv.[abr]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]}
Felsőreviscse/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Etv.-i/ŃĐŐBGVLTt	Etv.[abr]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]}
Egyházashetye/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Dunaharaszti/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Demeczky/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR¸l	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Cséry/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Csekenye/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Bódi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Brezje/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Bence/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Amade/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
1-je/BVÓŐĐś	1[adj_num]+[dikA_DATE_noun]{+[NOM]}
